Massachusetts, session 194th, S539.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 111 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following section:-
Section 245. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the
commonwealth shall not require proof of vaccination against COVID-19, mRNA vaccine, or
gene-altering procedure as a condition of entry to the Commonwealth.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the commonwealth and all of
its agencies, authorities and political subdivisions shall not require proof of vaccination against
COVID-19, mRNA vaccine, or gene-altering procedure as a condition of entry to a public
building.
of 2

Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, no public or private
elementary school, secondary school, high school, charter school, college, university or other
post-secondary institution of higher education shall require proof of vaccination against COVID-
19, mRNA vaccine, or gene-altering procedure as a condition of enrollment, access to campus or
attendance in in-person classes.
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the commonwealth shall not
require any private business to require proof of vaccination against COVID-19, mRNA vaccine,
or gene-altering procedure as a condition of entry to the business, or access to employment by
such business.
SECTION 2. The first paragraph of section 92A of chapter 272 of the General Laws, as
appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by adding the following sentence:-
No owner, lessee, proprietor, manager, superintendent, agent or employee of any place of
public accommodation, resort or amusement shall, directly or indirectly, by themselves or
another, require proof of vaccination against COVID-19, mRNA vaccine, or gene-altering
procedure as a condition of entry to a place of public accommodation, resort or amusement.
of 2